Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.310.040

ESD board—Members—Terms.

The term of office for each board member shall be four years and until a successor is duly elected and qualified. For the first election or an election following reorganization, board-member district positions numbered one, three, five, and seven in each educational service district shall be for a term of four years and positions numbered two, four, and six shall be for a term of two years.

[ 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 5; 1974 ex.s. c 75 s 4. Formerly RCW 28A.21.0303.]

NOTES:

Severability—1974 ex.s. c 75: See note following RCW 28A.310.030.